Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 6 of this  2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 688.010
to 688.201.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may approve by rule a national
examination to determine the fitness of  a person to practice as a physical therapist or
physical therapist assistant.  The physical therapist examination must test entry-level com-
petence related to physical therapy theory, patient examination and evaluation,  diagnosis,
prognosis, treatment intervention,  prevention and consultation. The physical therapist as-
sistant examination must test for requisite knowledge and skills in the technical application
of physical therapy services.
(2) In order to sit for an examination described in this section, an applicant shall:
(a) Meet nationally recognized requirements approved by the board that support  the in-
tegrity of the examination; and
(b) Agree to abide by security and copyright provisions related to the examination.
(3) If  the board determines that an applicant has violated subsection (2) of this section,
or engaged in or attempted to engage in  any conduct that subverts or undermines the in-
tegrity of the examination or validity  of examination results, the board may disqualify the
applicant from taking or retaking the examination.
(4) The  board shall report any violation of subsection (2) of this section or conduct de-
scribed in subsection (3) of this section to the Federation of  State Boards of Physical Ther-
apy or its successor organization.
SECTION 3.
For the purpose of requesting a state  or nationwide criminal records check
under ORS 181A.195, the Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may require the fingerprints  of
a person who is:
(1) Applying for a license or permit, or renewal of a license or  permit, issued under ORS
688.010 to 688.201;
(2) Employed or applying for employment by the board in a position  in which the person
has or will have access to information that is made confidential under state or federal  laws,
rules or regulations; or
(3) Under investigation by the board.
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 1
SECTION 4. A physical therapist  or physical therapist assistant shall report to the
Oregon Board of Physical Therapy a change to the physical therapist’s or physical  therapist
assistant’s name, business or residential address, contact email address  or contact telephone
number within 30 days after the date of the change.
SECTION 5. (1) A physical therapist may  perform dry needling, as defined by the Oregon
Board of Physical Therapy by rule.
(2) The board shall adopt rules to carry out this section, including  rules to establish
training requirements that a physical therapist must meet in  order to perform dry needling.
SECTION 6. (1) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may reinstate a revoked or sus-
pended physical therapist license or physical therapist assistant license if the person  whose
license was revoked or suspended:
(a) Meets the requirements for initial licensure; and
(b) Satisfactorily completes any requirements or meets any conditions  for reinstatement
of the license stipulated in a consent  order at the time the license was revoked or suspended.
(2) The board may require a person described in subsection (1) of this section  to demon-
strate competence to practice physical therapy or as a  physical therapist assistant by one
or more of the following:
(a) Under any  reasonable licensure conditions imposed by the board, completing a
supervised clinical practice as prescribed by the board;
(b) Completing, or demonstrating  completion of, continuing competence that was re-
quired during the period when the license was revoked or suspended;
(c) Passing an examination required by the board; or
(d) Successfully completing any practice assessment tools or evaluations required  by the
board.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 688.010 is amended to read:
688.010. As used in ORS 688.010 to 688.201, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Competence” means the application of knowledge, skills and behaviors  by a physical
therapist or physical therapist assistant required for the physical therapist or  physical
therapist assistant to function effectively, safely, ethically and legally within the context  of
the patient’s role and environment.
(2) “Consultation” means the act of a physical therapist seeking assistance  from, or
rendering professional or  expert opinion or advice to, another physical therapist or health
care provider.
(3) “Continuing competency” means the  continual process for a physical therapist or
physical therapist assistant to maintain and  document competence through ongoing self-
assessment, development and implementation of a personal learning plan, and the subsequent
reassessment of the personal learning plan.
(4) “On-site supervision” means supervision by a physical therapist who is:
(a) Continuously and physically  on site and present in the department or health care fa-
cility where the supervised services are provided;
(b) Immediately available to the supervisee; and
(c) Continually involved in the necessary aspects of patient care.
[(1)] (5) “Physical therapist” or “physiotherapist”  means a person [ who is licensed pursuant
to] licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201 to practice physical therapy.
[(2)] (6) “Physical therapist  aide” means a person who is trained by a physical therapist or
physical therapist assistant to perform designated and supervised routine tasks  related to physical
therapy and  who works under the direct on-site supervision of a physical therapist or physical
therapist assistant.
[(3)] (7) “Physical therapist  assistant” means a person  licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201
who assists a physical therapist in the administration of  selected components of physical therapy
treatment intervention. [ A physical therapist assistant works under  the supervision and direction of
the physical therapist. ]
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 2
[(4)] (8) “Physical therapy” means the  care and services provided by a physical therapist or by
a physical therapist assistant under the supervision and direction of a physical therapist.
[(5)] (9) “Practice of physical therapy” means:
(a) Examining, evaluating and testing  for mechanical, physiological and developmental impair-
ments, functional limitations and disabilities or other  neuromusculoskeletal conditions in order to
determine a physical therapy diagnosis or prognosis  or a plan of physical therapy intervention and
to assess the ongoing effects of physical therapy intervention.
(b) Alleviating impairments and  functional limitations by designing, implementing, administering
and modifying physical therapy interventions.
(c) Reducing  the risk of injury, impairment, functional limitation and disability by physical
therapy interventions that may include as a component the promotion and maintenance of health,
fitness and quality of life in all age populations.
(d) Consulting or providing educational services to a patient for  the purposes of paragraphs (a),
(b) and (c) of this subsection.
(10) “Supervision” means the process by which a  physical therapist oversees and directs
safe and effective delivery of patient  care by a physical therapist assistant or physical ther-
apist aide through appropriate verbal, written or electronic communication, while the phys-
ical therapist is physically on site or located remotely.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 688.015 is amended to read:
688.015. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds  and declares that providing for state administrative
control,  supervision,  licensure and regulation of the practice of physical therapy in this state serves
the purpose of protecting the public health, safety and welfare.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly  that only individuals who meet and maintain
prescribed standards of competence and conduct may engage in  the practice of physical therapy
as authorized by ORS 688.010 to 688.201 and implemented by the Oregon  Board of Physical Therapy.
(3) ORS 688.010 to 688.201 shall be liberally construed to  promote the public interest and
to accomplish the purposes of ORS 688.010 to 688.201.
SECTION 9.  ORS 688.020 is amended to read:
688.020. (1) Unless  a person is a licensed physical therapist or holds a temporary permit issued
under ORS 688.110, a person [ shall] may not:
(a) Practice physical therapy; or
(b) Use in connection with the name of  the person the words or letters[ ,] “P.T.,” “R.P.T.,”
“L.P.T.,” “D.P.T.,” “physio,”  “physical therapist,” “physiotherapist ,”  “registered physical thera-
pist,” “licensed physical therapist,” “Doctor of Physical Therapy”  or any other letters,  words,
abbreviations or insignia indicating that the person is a physical  therapist, or purports to be a
physical therapist.
(2)(a) Only a  person who holds a Doctor of Physical Therapy degree may use the title
“Doctor of Physical Therapy” or the abbreviation “D.P.T.” or other words or letters to indi-
cate that the person has earned a Doctor of Physical Therapy degree.
(b) A  person described in this subsection may not use the title of “doctor” without also
clearly using language to inform the public that the person is a doctor of physical therapy.
[(2)] (3) Unless a person holds a license as a physical therapist  assistant, a person [ shall] may
not:
(a) Practice as a physical therapist assistant; or
(b) Use in connection with the name of the person the words  or letters[ ,] “L.P.T.A.,” “P.T.A.,”
“physical therapist assistant,” “licensed physical therapist assistant,” or  any other letters, words,
abbreviations or insignia indicating that the  person is a physical therapist assistant or purports to
be a physical therapist assistant.
[(3)] (4) [ Subsections (1) and (2)  of this section do] This section does not apply to [an
individual] a person who is authorized to practice as a physical therapist[ ,] or  [work as a ] physical
therapist assistant[ ,] by compact privilege as defined in ORS 688.240.
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 3
(5) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may  seek an injunction against a person who
engages in conduct in violation of subsection (1) or  (3) of this section in a court of competent
jurisdiction. An injunction may be  issued upon demonstration by the board that the person
is likely to continue the conduct or has caused irreparable harm as a result of the conduct.
SECTION 10.  ORS 688.030 is amended to read:
688.030. (1) ORS  688.010 to 688.201 do not prohibit a person who is authorized by a health
professional regulatory  board to practice an occupation or profession from practicing that
occupation or profession, including by performing an activity or procedure that is included
in the practice of physical therapy that is within the person’s scope of practice,  if the person
does not represent, imply or claim that the person is a physical therapist  or physical thera-
pist assistant.
(2) ORS 688.010 to 688.201 do not apply to  a person :
[(1) A person engaging in the domestic application of any activity included in the definition of the
practice of physical therapy, if the person does  not represent to anyone receiving services or to the
public that the person is a physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant. ]
[(2) A person using any procedure included in the practice  of physical therapy if the procedure is
within the scope of practice of the person and the person: ]
[(a) Is licensed under a health care licensing law of this state; and ]
[(b) Does not represent or  imply that the person is a physical therapist or a physical therapist as-
sistant.]
[(3) A person who  is enrolled in an accredited physical therapy education program that leads to
a degree as a physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant and who  is satisfying supervised
clinical education requirements under the direct supervision of a physical therapist. ]
[(4) A person licensed in the practice  of physical therapy in another jurisdiction who is, for a pe-
riod not to exceed 60 days in each calendar year: ]
[(a) Providing  consultation from the other jurisdiction by means of telecommunications to a phys-
ical therapist in this state; ]
[(b) Providing physical therapy services  to an individual employed by or affiliated with a touring
theater company, a performing arts company, an athletic team or an athletic organization; or ]
[(c) Performing physical therapy while teaching or participating in an  educational conference in
this state.]
(a) Enrolled in an entry-level professional education program approved  by the Oregon
Board of Physical Therapy who is satisfying  clinical education requirements related to the
person’s physical therapy education while under on-site supervision;
(b) Satisfying a clinical education requirement as required by the board under  on-site
supervision;
(c) Practicing as a physical therapist or physical  therapist assistant in the employment
of the Armed Forces  of the United States, the United States Public Health Service or the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs pursuant to a federal regulation  authorizing
the person’s practice, if the person is practicing within the scope of employment;
(d) Licensed as a  physical therapist or physical therapist assistant in another state, the
District of Columbia or a territory of the United States and:
(A) Providing consultation to a health care provider licensed in this state;
(B) For a period of  not more than 60 days in a calendar year, practicing physical therapy
or assisting  in the provision of physical therapy services during a declared national, state
or local emergency, so long as  the person has notified the board of the person’s intent to
practice or assist; or
(C) For a period of not more  than 60 days in a calendar year, practicing physical therapy
or assisting in the provision of physical therapy services if  the person is displaced from the
person’s residence or place of employment due to a declared national, state or  local emer-
gency, so long as the person notifies the board of  the person’s intent to practice or assist;
or
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 4
(e) Licensed as  a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant in another state, the
District of Columbia or a territory of the United States, or authorized to practice  physical
therapy or assist in the  provision of physical therapy services in another country, and, for
a period of not more than 60 days in a calendar year:
(A) Teaching, demonstrating or  providing physical therapy services in connection with a
continuing education seminar; or
(B) Employed or contracted to provide physical  therapy or assist with the provision of
physical therapy services to patients affiliated with or employed by  an established athletic
team or organization or a performing arts company  temporarily practicing, competing or
performing in this state.
SECTION 11.  ORS 688.050 is amended to read:
688.050. [(1) Each applicant for a license as a physical therapist shall: ]
[(a) Be at least 18 years of age. ]
[(b) Be of good moral character as determined by the Oregon Board of Physical Therapy. ]
[(c)(A) Be a  graduate of an accredited professional physical therapy education program approved
by the board; or ]
[(B) Have military experience or training that the board determines  is substantially equivalent to
the education required by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. ]
[(d) Pass to the satisfaction  of the board an examination approved by the board to determine the
fitness of the applicant to practice as a physical therapist or to be entitled to be licensed as  provided
in ORS 688.080. An applicant for licensure as a physical therapist who does  not pass the examination
on the first attempt may retake the examination as provided by rules adopted by the board. ]
[(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, an applicant for a license as
a physical therapist who has been educated outside the United States shall: ]
[(a) Provide evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant’s physical therapy education  pro-
gram is recognized or accredited and that the  applicant’s education is substantially equivalent to the
education of  physical therapists who graduated from accredited physical therapy education programs
approved by the board. If the  board determines that the education of an applicant who graduated from
a physical therapy education program outside the United States is not substantially equivalent,  the
board may require the applicant to complete additional course work before the board proceeds with the
application process. ]
[(b) Obtain an evaluation of the applicant’s  educational credentials by a credentials evaluation
agency approved by the board. ]
[(c) Demonstrate proficiency in English if required by the board. ]
[(d) Pass to the satisfaction of the board an examination approved by the board. ]
[(3) If an applicant who has been educated outside the United States is  a graduate of an accredited
physical therapy education program approved by the board, the board may waive the requirements  of
subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section. ]
(1) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may issue a license to  practice as a physical
therapist to an applicant who:
(a) Applies to the board in a form and manner prescribed by the board;
(b) Is at least 18 years of age;
(c) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this  section, submits proof of gradu-
ation from an accredited  professional physical therapy education program accredited by a
national accreditation agency and approved by the board by rule;
(d) Passes, to the satisfaction of the board,  a national examination described in section
2 of this 2025 Act to determine the applicant’s  fitness to practice physical therapy and passes
any other examinations required by the board;
(e) Pays the fee required by the board;
(f) Passes a state or nationwide criminal records  check under ORS 181A.195 to the sat-
isfaction of the board; and
(g) Meets any other requirements established by the board by rule.
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 5
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection  (1) of this section, an applicant for a
license as a physical therapist who has completed a physical therapy education program,  in-
cluding an  education program of the Armed Forces of the United States, that is not accred-
ited by a national accreditation agency and is approved by the board by rule shall:
(a) Provide satisfactory evidence to the board that the applicant’s education:
(A) Is substantially equivalent to that provided by  an entry-level physical therapy edu-
cation program accredited as described in subsection (1) of this section;
(B) Is approved by the board; and
(C) Prepared the applicant for engaging without  restriction in the practice of physical
therapy;
(b) Meet  any criteria for educational requirements established by the board by rule, as
demonstrated by a credentials evaluation directed by the board, and complete  any additional
education as the board requires;
(c) If required, pass an English proficiency examination prescribed by the board; and
(d) Complete any supervised clinical practice required by the board by rule.
(3) In addition to the requirements  of subsection (2) of this section, an applicant who
graduated from  a physical therapy education program located in another country shall
demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board that  the education program is recognized by
that country’s ministry of education or similar body.
(4) In processing an application for licensure submitted under  this section, the board
shall notify the applicant of any deficiencies in the application.
(5) A physical  therapist shall, on advertising and correspondence related to the physical
therapist’s practice, use the letters “P.T” or the term “physical  therapist” to make known
the person’s licensure to practice physical therapy.
(6) A physical therapist shall adhere to the recognized standards of ethics of the physical
therapy profession as established by rule.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 688.055 is amended to read:
688.055. [Each applicant for a license as a physical therapist assistant shall: ]
[(1) Be at least 18 years of age. ]
[(2) Be of good moral character as determined by the Oregon Board of Physical Therapy. ]
[(3) Be a graduate of an accredited physical therapist assistant education program approved  by the
board.]
[(4) Pass to the satisfaction of the board an examination approved  by the board to determine the
fitness of the applicant  to work as a physical therapist assistant or to be entitled to be licensed as
provided in ORS 688.080. An applicant for licensure  as a physical therapist assistant who does not
pass the examination on the first attempt may retake the examination as provided by rules adopted by
the board. ]
(1) The Oregon Board of  Physical Therapy may issue a license to practice as a physical
therapist assistant to an applicant who:
(a) Applies to the board in a form and manner prescribed by the board;
(b) Is at least 18 years of age;
(c) Except as provided in subsections  (2) and (3) of this section, submits proof of gradu-
ation from an accredited professional physical therapist assistant education program  ac-
credited by a national accreditation agency and approved by the board by rule;
(d) Passes, to the satisfaction of the  board, a national examination described in section
2 of this  2025 Act to determine the applicant’s fitness to practice as a physical therapist as-
sistant and passes any other examinations required by the board;
(e) Pays the fee required by the board;
(f) Passes a state or nationwide criminal records  check under ORS 181A.195 to the sat-
isfaction of the board; and
(g) Meets any other requirements established by the board by rule.
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 6
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection  (1) of this section, an applicant for a
license as a physical therapist assistant who has completed an education program,  including
an education program of the Armed Forces of the United States, that is not accredited by a
national accreditation agency and is approved by the board by rule shall:
(a) Provide satisfactory evidence to the board that the applicant’s education:
(A) Is substantially equivalent to that provided  by an entry-level physical therapist as-
sistant education program accredited as described in subsection (1) of this section;
(B) Is approved by the board; and
(C) Prepared the applicant to work as a physical therapist assistant;
(b) Meet any criteria for educational requirements established by the board by rule,  as
demonstrated by a credentials evaluation directed by the board, and complete  any additional
education as the board requires;
(c) If required, pass an English proficiency examination prescribed by the board; and
(d) Complete any supervised clinical practice required by the board by rule.
(3) In addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of  this section, an applicant who
graduated from  an education program located in another country shall demonstrate to the
satisfaction of the board  that the education program is recognized by that country’s ministry
of education or similar body.
(4) In processing an application for licensure submitted under  this section, the board
shall notify the applicant of any deficiencies in the application.
(5) A physical therapist assistant  shall adhere to the recognized standards of ethics of
the physical therapy profession as established by rule.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 688.080 is amended to read:
688.080. (1) The Oregon Board  of Physical Therapy may license as a physical therapist or [ li-
cense as a ] physical therapist assistant, without examination  or  verification of graduation from
an education program, any person who:
(a) Applies for a license as provided in ORS [ 688.040] 688.050 or 688.055; and
[(b) Is of good moral character as determined by the board; and ]
[(c)] (b) On the date  of [ making] application, is a physical therapist or physical therapist as-
sistant who  has a [ valid] current  unrestricted license from [ any other ] another state or territory
of the United States if the requirements for licensing of physical therapists or physical  therapist
assistants in the state or territory in which  the applicant is licensed are substantially equivalent to
Oregon’s licensure requirements and the [ applicant passed to the satisfaction of the examiner of such
state or territory a written examination that is approved by the board of this  state ] person met the
licensing requirements of  the other state or territory at the time of the person’s initial
licensure.
(2) [Each applicant] To be licensed under this section , an applicant  shall :
(a) Pay a fee to the board at the time of [ filing the ] application[ .];
(b) Pass any examination required by the board by rule;
(c) Pass a state or nationwide  criminal records check under ORS 181A.195 to the satis-
faction of the board; and
(d) Meet any other requirements established by the board by rule.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 688.100 is amended to read:
688.100. (1) A person  [ who is ] licensed as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant
shall apply to the Oregon  Board of Physical Therapy to renew the person’s license pursuant to
the rules of the [ Oregon Board of Physical Therapy ] board. [ A person who fails to renew the ] If a
person fails to renew the person’s  license on or before the expiration date specified by board
rule, the person’s license is lapsed and the person  may not practice  as a physical therapist or
work as a physical therapist assistant in this state until the lapsed license is [ renewed] reinstated.
(2) The board may reinstate a lapsed license upon completion of a renewal application and
payment of all past renewal and delinquency fees , subject to the board’s discretion as  described
in subsection (3) of this section .
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 7
[(3) If a person’s license has lapsed  for more than five consecutive years, that person shall reapply
for a  license and pay all applicable fees. The person shall also demonstrate to the board’s satisfaction
competence to practice physical therapy, or shall serve an internship under a restricted license or take
remedial or refresher courses, or both, at the  discretion of the board. The board may also require the
applicant to take an examination. ]
[(4) A person who is licensed as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant shall report
to the board a name change or any change in business or  residential address, electronic mail address
or contact telephone number within 30 days after the date of change. ]
(3) If a  person’s license to practice as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant
has lapsed for an amount of time specified by the board  by rule, in order to have the license
reinstated, the person shall meet the requirements  for initial licensure and demonstrate, to
the satisfaction of the board, competence to practice physical therapy or as a physical ther-
apist assistant by one or more the following:
(a) Under any  reasonable licensure conditions imposed by the board, completing a
supervised clinical practice as prescribed by the board by rule;
(b) Completing, or demonstrating  completion of, continuing competence that was re-
quired during the period of lapse;
(c) Passing an examination required by the board; or
(d) Providing proof of licensed  practice as a physical therapist or physical therapist as-
sistant in another jurisdiction during the period of lapse.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 688.110 is amended to read:
688.110. (1) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy, in its  discretion, may issue without exam-
ination a temporary permit to a person to practice as a physical therapist or to work  as a physical
therapist assistant in this state if the person files an application for  license as provided in ORS
[688.040 or] 688.080, and pays to the board at the time of filing the application the temporary  permit
fee.
(2) A person holding a temporary permit may practice physical therapy only under the direction
of a physical therapist licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201.
(3) The temporary permit shall be granted for a period not to exceed three months. The board
may renew the temporary permit at its discretion for no more than 90 days.
SECTION 16.  ORS 688.135 is amended to read:
688.135. (1) A physical therapist [ licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201 ] shall:
(a) Be responsible for managing all aspects of the physical therapy care  of each patient , in-
cluding:
(A) The initial patient evaluation, determination of  diagnosis, prognosis and development
of the plan of treatment intervention and appropriate documentation;
(B) Patient re-evaluation, with appropriate documentation; and
(C) Discharge of a patient from physical therapy  with appropriate documentation that
specifies the patient’s response to the treatment intervention .
(b) Ensure the qualifications of all physical therapist assistants  and physical therapist aides
working under the direction and supervision of the physical therapist.
(c) Provide for each  patient the [ therapeutic] treatment  intervention that requires the
[expertise ] education, skills and knowledge of a  physical therapist and determine and supervise the
use of physical therapist assistants or physical therapist aides  to provide care that is safe, effective
and efficient.
(2)(a) A physical therapist may delegate routine tasks to a physical  therapy aide who
works under the physical therapist’s supervision.
(b) A physical therapist  assistant shall work under a physical therapist’s supervision and
shall document the physical therapy care and  services the physical therapist assistant pro-
vides.
(3) A physical  therapist shall communicate the plan of treatment intervention with the
patient, or the patient’s authorized representative, and obtain informed consent from the
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 8
patient, or patient’s authorized representative, to carry out the plan of treatment  inter-
vention.
[(2)] (4)(a) [ Responsibility for patient care management shall  include ] A physical therapist is
responsible for accurate documentation and billing of the physical therapy  services provided. In-
formation relating to the physical therapist-patient relationship is confidential and a physical  ther-
apist shall comply with the laws and  rules governing the use and disclosure of a patient’s protected
health information as provided in ORS 192.553 to 192.581.
(b) A physical therapist assistant is responsible  for the accurate documentation and
billing of services provided by the physical therapist assistant.  Information relating to the
physical therapist assistant-patient relationship  is confidential and a physical therapist as-
sistant shall comply with the laws and rules governing the  use and disclosure of a patient’s
protected health information as provided in ORS 192.553 to 192.581.
[(3)] (5) [ Each] A physical therapist and a physical therapist assistant  shall display a copy
of the physical therapist’s or physical therapist assistant’s  license or current  renewal verification
in a location accessible to public view [ at the physical therapist’s place of practice or employment ].
[(4)] (6) A physical therapist  may purchase, store and administer topical and aerosol medications
as part of the  practice of physical therapy as defined in ORS 688.010. A physical therapist shall
comply  with  any rules adopted by the State Board of Pharmacy specifying protocols for storage of
medications.
[(5)] (7) A physical therapist and a physical therapist assistant  shall adhere to the standards
of ethics [ recognized by the physical therapy profession as further  established by a nationally recog-
nized professional organization of physical therapists and as further adopted by the board ] described
in ORS 688.050 and 688.055.
[(6)] (8) A physical therapist shall disclose to a patient any direct  financial interest in products
that the physical therapist endorses and recommends to the  patient at the time of [ such] the
endorsement or recommendation. The physical therapist shall document the  disclosure [ shall be
documented] in the patient’s record.
[(7)] (9) A physical therapist  may provide compensable services to an injured worker only as
authorized by ORS 656.250.
[(8)] (10) Nothing in ORS 688.010 to 688.201 shall prohibit a physical  therapist [ licensed under
ORS 688.010 to 688.201 ] from accepting a referral from a veterinarian licensed under  ORS chapter
686. The referral must be in writing and specify the  treatment or therapy to be provided, pursuant
to ORS 686.040 (4). A physical therapist practicing under this subsection shall be  held to the
standard of care for veterinarians set forth  in ORS chapter 686  and as further defined by the
Oregon Board of Physical Therapy .
[(9)] (11) Unless state or federal laws relating to confidentiality or the protection of health in-
formation prohibit disclosure, a physical therapist  who has reasonable cause to believe that a
licensee of another health professional regulatory  board has engaged in prohibited conduct as
defined in ORS 676.150 shall report the prohibited conduct in the manner provided in ORS 676.150.
SECTION 17.  ORS 688.140 is amended to read:
688.140. (1) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy, after notice and hearing as provided  in ORS
688.145, may impose any or all of the following sanctions or take any of the following actions upon
any of the grounds specified in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Refuse to license any applicant.
(b) Refuse to renew the license of any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant.
(c) Suspend or revoke the license of any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant.
(d) Suspend or revoke a temporary permit issued under ORS 688.110.
(e) Impose a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000.
(f) Impose probation with authority to limit or restrict a license.
(g) Impose conditions, restrictions or limitations on practice.
(h) Issue letters of reprimand.
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 9
(i) Impose any other appropriate sanction, including assessment of the reasonable costs of a
proceeding under ORS 688.145 as a civil penalty. Costs include, but  are not limited to, the costs of
investigation, attorney fees, hearing officer costs and the costs of discovery.
(2) Grounds exist for the imposition of sanctions as specified in  subsection (1) of this section
when a person:
(a) Violates any provision of ORS 688.010 to 688.201, board rules or a written order  from the
board.
(b) Practices or offers to practice beyond the scope of practice of physical therapy.
(c) Obtains or  attempts to obtain or renew a license or temporary permit by fraud or misrepre-
sentation.
(d) Provides substandard care as a  physical therapist through a deliberate or negligent act or
failure to act, regardless of whether injury to the patient occurs.
(e) Provides substandard care as a physical therapist assistant by exceeding the authority to
perform components of physical therapy  interventions selected by the supervising physical therapist
or through a deliberate or negligent act or failure to  act, regardless of whether injury to the patient
occurs.
(f) Fails as a physical therapist to supervise physical therapist assistants in accordance  with
board rules.
(g) Fails as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant to  supervise physical therapist
aides in accordance with board rules.
(h) Subject to the provisions  of ORS 670.280, has been convicted of a crime in Oregon or any
other state, territory or country if the crime poses a risk to the public’s safety or welfare rel-
ative to the practice of physical therapy . For purposes of this paragraph, conviction includes a
verdict of guilty, a plea of guilty or a plea of no contest.
(i) Has an impairment as defined in ORS 676.303.
(j) Has had  an application for licensure refused because of conduct or circumstances that would
be grounds for  sanctions by the board, or a license revoked or suspended, or other disciplinary
action taken by the proper authorities of another state, territory or country.
(k) Engages in sexual misconduct. For purposes of this paragraph, sexual misconduct includes
but is not limited to:
(A) Engaging in sexual conduct or soliciting  a sexual relationship [ with a current patient ],
whether consensual or nonconsensual , with  a patient with whom the physical therapist or
physical therapist assistant has a current physical therapist-patient or  physical therapist
assistant-patient relationship.
(B) Verbally, physically or through electronic  means making advances, requesting favors,
expressing thoughts or feelings  or making gestures that are sexual in nature or that rea-
sonably may be construed by a patient as sexual in nature.
[(B)] (C) Intentionally exposing or viewing a  completely or partially disrobed patient in the
course of treatment if the exposure or viewing  is not related to patient diagnosis or treatment under
current practice standards.
(L) Directly or indirectly requests, receives, pays or participates in  dividing, transferring or
assigning an unearned fee or profits by a means of a credit  or other valuable consideration such as
an unearned commission, discount or gratuity in connection with the furnishing  of physical therapy
services. This paragraph does not prohibit the members  of any regularly and properly organized
business entity recognized by law and comprised of physical therapists from  dividing fees received
for professional services among themselves as they determine.
(m) Fails to adhere to the standards of ethics  of the physical therapy profession established by
board rule.
(n) Obtains or  attempts to obtain a fee for physical therapy services by fraud or misrepresen-
tation.
(o) Makes misleading, deceptive or fraudulent representations in  the course of providing phys-
ical therapy services.
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 10
(p) Fails to report to the board, when the person has direct knowledge of  an unprofessional,
incompetent or illegal act that reasonably appears to  be in violation of ORS 688.010 to 688.201 or
any rules of the board.
(q) Interferes with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding of the board.
(r) Aids or abets a person who is not licensed in this state to practice physical therapy.
(s) Fails to maintain adequate patient records.
(t) Fails to maintain patient confidentiality.
(u) Provides treatment intervention that is  not warranted by the patient’s condition or continues
treatment beyond the point of reasonable benefit to the patient.
(v) Provides physical therapy  services or participates in physical therapy services solely for
reasons of personal or institutional financial gain.
(w) Aids or causes another person, directly or indirectly,  to violate ORS 688.010 to 688.201 or
rules of the board, fraudulently uses or permits the use of a  license number in any way, or acts with
the intent to violate ORS 688.010 to 688.201 or rules of the board.
(x) Abuses the physical therapist-patient or physical therapist assistant-patient relation-
ship to exert undue influence  or to exploit any person over whom the physical therapist or
physical therapist assistant has supervisory, evaluative or other authority.
(y) Engages, or attempts to engage, in conduct  that subverts or undermines the integrity
of an examination described  in section 2 of this 2025 Act, including but not limited to using
in any manner recalled or memorized examination questions, violating security or copyright
provisions related to  the examination, failing to comply with examination administration
procedures, communicating  or attempting to communicate with other applicants during an
examination or copying or sharing examination questions or portions of questions.
(3) To enforce the provisions of this section, the board is  authorized to initiate an investigation
and take the following actions:
(a) Receive complaints filed against persons and conduct timely investigations.
(b) Initiate its own investigation if the board has reason to believe that there may have been  a
violation of ORS 688.010 to 688.201.
(c) Issue a subpoena to compel the attendance of any witness  or the production of any doc-
umentation relating to a matter under investigation. In addition to the board, the executive director
or the executive director’s designee may issue a subpoena. When the board,  in the course of an in-
vestigation, requires the production of patient records for inspection and copying by  subpoena, or
otherwise, the records shall be produced without  regard to whether patient consent has been ob-
tained and without regard to any claim of confidentiality or privilege.
(d) Take the deposition of a  witness, including a physical therapist or physical therapist assist-
ant being investigated, in the manner provided by law in civil cases.
(e) Take emergency  action to suspend a person’s license or restrict the person’s practice or
employment pending proceedings by the board.
(f) Report to the appropriate district attorney all cases that, in the judgment of the  board,
warrant prosecution.
(g) Require a person to undergo  a mental, physical, chemical dependency or competency evalu-
ation at the person’s expense when the board has objectively reasonable grounds to believe that the
person is  or may be unable to practice physical therapy with reasonable skill and safety, with the
results being reported  to the board. The report shall not be disclosed to the public but may be re-
ceived into evidence in a proceeding between the board and the  person when the mental, physical,
chemical dependency or competency of the person is at  issue, notwithstanding any claim of privilege
by the person.
(4) If the board finds that the information  received in a complaint or an investigation does not
merit disciplinary action against a person, nondisciplinary actions may ensue. The board  may then
take the following actions:
(a) Dismiss the complaint.
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 11
(b) Issue a confidential advisory letter to the person that is nondisciplinary  and that notifies the
physical therapist or physical  therapist assistant that certain conduct or practices must be modified
or eliminated.
(5) The board may apply for  injunctive relief in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin
any person from committing  any act in violation of ORS 688.010 to 688.201. Injunction proceedings
are in addition to, and not in lieu of, penalties or other  sanctions prescribed in ORS 688.010 to
688.201.
(6) If the board receives a complaint that a person  is engaged in conduct that violates
ORS 688.020 (1) or (3), or on its own initiative begins an investigation, the board shall inves-
tigate to the extent necessary to determine whether the person  is engaged in the alleged
conduct and shall inform the person of the investigation and reason for the investigation.
The board may refer the matter to the Attorney General or to the appropriate  district at-
torney.
(7) Sexual contact that occurs between a physical therapist  and patient or physical
therapist assistant and patient after the termination  of the physical therapist-patient or
physical therapist assistant-patient relationship may constitute sexual misconduct as de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section if the sexual contact is a  result of the exploitation
of trust or knowledge or the influence of emotions derived from the physical  therapist-
patient or physical therapist assistant-patient relationship.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 688.160 is amended to read:
688.160. (1) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy  operates as a semi-independent state agency
subject to ORS 182.456 to 182.472, for purposes of carrying out the provisions of ORS 688.010  to
688.201, 688.240 and 688.990. The  board consists of eight members appointed by the Governor and
subject to confirmation by the Senate  in the manner provided in ORS 171.562 and 171.565. All
members of the board must be residents of this state. Of the members of the board:
(a) Five must be physical therapists  who are Oregon residents, possess unrestricted licenses to
practice physical therapy in this state, have been practicing in  this state for at least two years
[immediately] preceding their  appointments and have been practicing in the field of physical therapy
for at least five years.
(b) One must be a licensed physical therapist assistant.
(c) Two must be public members who have an interest in consumer rights and who are not:
(A) Otherwise eligible for appointment to the board; or
(B) The spouse, domestic partner, child, parent  or sibling of a physical therapist or physical
therapist assistant.
(2)(a) Board members  required to be physical therapists or physical therapist assistants may be
selected by the Governor from a list of three to five nominees for each  vacancy, submitted by the
Oregon Physical Therapy Association.
(b) In selecting the members of the board, the  Governor shall strive to balance the represen-
tation on the board according to:
(A) Geographic areas of this state; and
(B) Ethnic group.
(3)(a) The term  of office of each member is four years, but a member serves at the pleasure of
the Governor. The terms must be  staggered so that no more than three terms end each year. A
member is  eligible for reappointment , but may not serve for more than two successive four-year
terms or for more than 10 consecutive years .
(b) In the event  of a vacancy in the office of a member of the board other than by reason of the
expiration of a term, the Governor, not later than 90 days after the  occurrence of the vacancy, shall
appoint a person to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.
(c) A board member shall be removed immediately from the board if, during the  member’s term,
the member:
(A) Is not a resident of this state;
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 12
(B) Has been absent from three consecutive board meetings, unless at least one absence  is ex-
cused;
(C) Is not a licensed physical therapist or  a retired physical therapist who was a licensed
physical therapist in good standing at the time  of retirement, if the board member was appointed to
serve on the board as a physical therapist; or
(D) Is not  a licensed physical therapist assistant or a retired physical therapist assistant who
was a licensed physical therapist assistant in good standing at the time of  retirement, if the board
member was appointed to serve on the board as a retired physical therapist assistant.
(4) Each member  of the board is entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495. The board may provide by rule  for compensation to board members for the performance of
official duties at a rate that is greater than the rate provided in ORS 292.495.
(5) A board member who acts within the  scope of board duties, without malice and in reasonable
belief that the member’s action is warranted by law, is immune from civil liability.
(6) The board shall have power to:
(a) Establish matters of policy affecting administration of ORS 688.010 to 688.201;
(b) Provide for examinations for physical therapists and  physical therapist assistants[  and adopt
passing scores for the examinations ];
(c) Adopt rules necessary to carry out and enforce the provisions of ORS 688.010 to 688.201  and
688.240;
(d) Establish standards and tests to determine the  qualifications of applicants for licenses to
practice physical therapy in this state;
(e) Issue licenses to persons who meet the requirements of ORS 688.010 to 688.201;
(f) Adopt rules relating to the supervision  and the duties of physical therapist aides who assist
in performing routine work under supervision;
(g) Adopt rules establishing minimum continuing competency requirements for all licensees;
(h) [ Exercise general supervision over ] Regulate  the practice of physical therapy within this
state;
[(i) Establish and collect fees for  the application or examination for, or the renewal, reinstatement
or duplication of, a license under ORS 688.040, 688.080 or  688.100 or for the issuance of a temporary
permit under ORS 688.110; and ]
[(j)] (i) Establish and collect fees to carry out and  enforce the provisions of ORS 688.010 to
688.201[.] and 688.240;
(j) Establish advisory committees as necessary to further the work of the board;
(k) Participate in a national examination, licensure and disciplinary database;
(L) For the purpose of requesting a  state or nationwide criminal records check under
ORS 181A.195, require the fingerprints of a person who is applying  for the issuance or re-
newal of a license or permit issued by the board;
(m)(A) Collect, at the time of licensure issuance  or renewal, data that the board deter-
mines necessary to assess the physical therapy workforce in this state;
(B) Develop and maintain a physical therapy workforce database; and
(C) Share physical therapy workforce information with the Oregon Health  Authority; and
(n) Establish licensure endorsements or practice specialization designations.
(7) The board shall meet [ as determined by the board ] at least quarterly  and at  any other time
at the call of the board chairperson[ , who ]. The  chairperson, and any other officers necessary
for the operation of the board,  shall be elected by the members of the board. All  members have
equal voting privileges.
(8) The board may appoint  and fix the compensation of staff as necessary to carry out the op-
erations of the board.
(9) The board shall:
(a) Maintain a current list of all persons regulated under ORS 688.010 to 688.201, including  the
persons’ names, current business and residential addresses, telephone numbers,  electronic mail ad-
dresses and license numbers.
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 13
(b) Provide information to the public regarding the procedure for filing a complaint  against a
physical therapist or physical therapist assistant.
(c) Publish at least annually,  and in a format or place determined by the board, final disciplinary
actions taken against  physical therapists and physical therapist assistants and other information,
including rules, in order to guide physical therapists  and physical therapist assistants regulated
pursuant to ORS 688.010 to 688.201 and 688.240.
(d) Report final disciplinary action taken by  the board to a national disciplinary database
recognized by the board.
(e) Report information of alleged misconduct by licensees and,  as the misconduct relates
to the practice of physical therapy, by unlicensed persons,  other health care providers or
entities to the appropriate authority, unless prohibited by law.
SECTION 19.  ORS 688.435 is amended to read:
688.435. The provisions of ORS 688.405 to 688.605 do not apply to the following persons:
(1) Persons who operate dental X-ray equipment for the sole purpose of oral radiography.
(2) Students in approved  schools, while practicing one of the medical imaging modalities or
subspecialties under the supervision of the school’s assigned clinical instructor.
(3) Specific licensed health care providers, other  than physicians, who use sonographic equip-
ment within their lawful scope of practice.
(4) Licensed physicians.
(5) Persons who use radiation for the purpose of research or education. As used in this  sub-
section:
(a) “Education” means a program of study or training:
(A) In which a student, trainee or health care practitioner learns to practice  or improve skills
for a profession regulated by a health professional regulatory  board, as defined in ORS 676.160; and
(B)(i) That is accredited by a national  or regional post-secondary accrediting body or organiza-
tion; or
(ii) That is approved or  recognized by a health professional regulatory board, as defined in ORS
676.160, for purposes related to being authorized to practice a profession.
(b) “Research” means systematic investigation, including research development, testing  and
evaluation, designed to develop or contribute  to general knowledge and that has been approved by
an institutional review board that provides for the protection of human research subjects  in ac-
cordance with federal regulations.
(6) Persons who use sonographic equipment for the sole purpose of ophthalmic sonography.
(7) Physical therapists, as defined in ORS 688.010, who use  sonographic equipment for the
sole purpose of sonography related to the  practice of physical therapy, as defined in ORS
688.010.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 811.604, as amended  by section 168, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
811.604. Application for issuance or renewal of a disabled person parking permit  in the form of
an individual placard or decal issued under ORS 811.602 shall include:
(1) A certificate, signed and dated within six months preceding the  date of application, by a li-
censed physician, a licensed nurse practitioner [ or], a licensed physician associate  or a  licensed
physical therapist to the Department of Transportation that the applicant is a person with a disa-
bility or a  certificate, signed and dated within six months preceding the date of application, by a
licensed optometrist that the applicant is a person  with a disability because of loss of vision or
substantial loss of visual acuity or visual field beyond correction;
(2) The state-issued licensing number of the licensed physician, certified nurse  practitioner, li-
censed physician associate , licensed physical therapist  or licensed optometrist who signed the
certificate described in subsection (1) of this section; and
(3) The number of  a driver license, driver permit, identification card or parking identification
card issued to the applicant by the department.
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 14
SECTION 21.  ORS 742.400, as amended by section 152, chapter  73, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
742.400. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Claim” means a written demand for payment from or on behalf of a  covered practitioner for
an injury alleged to have been caused by professional negligence that is made in a  complaint filed
with a court of appropriate jurisdiction.
(b) “Covered practitioner” means a :
(A) Chiropractic physician[ ,] licensed under ORS 684.040 to 684.105;
(B) Physician licensed under ORS chapter 677  or physician associate licensed under ORS
[chapter 677] licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 [,];
(C) Nurse practitioner[ ,] licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(D) Optometrist[ ,] licensed under ORS 683.010 to 683.340;
(E) Dentist[ ,] licensed under ORS chapter 679 or  dental hygienist [ or] licensed under ORS
680.040 to 680.100;
(F) Naturopathic physician[ .] licensed under ORS chapter 685; or
(G) Physical therapist licensed under ORS 688.040 to 688.145.
(c) “Disposition of a claim” means:
(A) A judgment or award against the covered practitioner by a court, a jury or an arbitrator;
(B) A withdrawal or dismissal of the claim; or
(C) A settlement of the claim.
(d) “Reporter” means:
(A) A primary insurer;
(B) A public body required to defend, save harmless and indemnify an officer, employee  or agent
of the public body under ORS 30.260 to 30.300;
(C) An entity that self-insures or  indemnifies for claims alleging professional negligence on the
part of a covered practitioner; or
(D) A health maintenance organization as defined in ORS 750.005.
(2) Within 30 days after receiving notice of a claim, a reporter shall report the claim to  the
appropriate board, as follows:
(a) The Oregon Medical Board if the covered practitioner is  a physician or physician associate
[licensed under ORS chapter 677 ];
(b) The Oregon State Board of Nursing if the covered practitioner is a nurse practitioner;
(c) The Oregon Board of Optometry if the covered practitioner is an optometrist;
(d) The Oregon Board of Dentistry if the covered practitioner is a dentist or dental hygienist;
(e) The Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine if the  covered practitioner is a naturopathic
physician; [or]
(f) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners if the  covered practitioner is a chiropractic
physician[.]; or
(g) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy  if the covered practitioner is a physical ther-
apist.
(3) The report required under subsection (2) of this section shall include:
(a) The name of the covered practitioner;
(b) The name of the person that filed the claim;
(c) The date on which the claim was filed; and
(d) The reason or reasons  for the claim, except that the report may not disclose any data that
is privileged under ORS 41.675.
(4) Within 30 days after the date  of an action taken in disposition of a claim, a reporter shall
notify the appropriate board identified in subsection (2) of this section of the disposition.
(5)(a) A board that receives a report of a claim  under this section shall publicly post the report
on the board’s website if the claim results in a judicial finding or admission of liability or  a money
judgment, award or settlement that  involves a payment to the claimant. The board may not publicly
post information about claims that did not result in a  judicial finding or admission of liability or a
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 15
money judgment, award or settlement that involves  a payment to the claimant but shall make the
information available to the public upon request.
(b) If a board discloses information about a claim that is the subject of a  report received under
this section, the board shall indicate in the disclosure whether the claim resulted in a  judicial
finding or an admission of liability or a  money judgment, an award or a settlement that involves a
payment to the claimant. A board may not  publicly disclose or publish any allegations or factual
assertions included in the claim unless the complaint  resulted in a judicial finding or an admission
of liability or a money judgment,  an award or a settlement that involves a payment to the claimant.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, “judicial finding” means a finding of liability by a court, a
jury or an arbitrator.
(6) A board that receives a report under this section shall provide copies  of the report to each
health care facility licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.119, 441.525 to 441.595,  441.815, 441.820,
441.990, 441.993, 442.342, 442.344 and 442.400 to 442.463 that  employs or grants staff privileges to the
covered practitioner.
(7) A person that reports in good faith concerning any  matter required to be reported under this
section is immune from civil liability by reason of making the report.
SECTION 22. ORS 688.040 and 688.090 are repealed.
SECTION 23. The amendments to ORS 688.160 by section 18 of this 2025 Act apply to
members appointed to the Oregon Board of Physical Therapy  on or after the operative date
specified in section 24 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 24. (1) Sections 2 to 6 of this 2025  Act, the amendments to ORS 688.010, 688.015,
688.020, 688.030, 688.050, 688.055, 688.080, 688.100, 688.110, 688.135,  688.140, 688.160, 688.435,
742.400 and 811.604 by sections 7  to 21 of this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 688.040 and
688.090 by section 22 of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2027.
(2) The Oregon Board of  Physical Therapy may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that  is necessary to enable the board to exercise,
on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the board by sections 2 to 6 of this  2025 Act and the
amendments to ORS  688.010, 688.015, 688.020, 688.030, 688.050, 688.055, 688.080, 688.100, 688.110,
688.135, 688.140, 688.160, 688.435, 742.400 and 811.604 by sections 7 to 21 of this  2025 Act and
the repeal of ORS 688.040 and 688.090 by section 22 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 25. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 16
Passed by House April 22, 2025
Repassed by House June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3824 (HB 3824-B) Page 17